Illinois, session 104th, HB2886.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Open Meetings Act is amended by changing 5Section 7 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 120/7)7    Sec. 7. Attendance by a means other than physical 8presence.9    (a) If a quorum of the members of the public body is 10physically present as required by Section 2.01, a majority of 11the public body may allow a member of that body to attend the 12meeting by other means if the member is prevented from 13physically attending because of: (i) personal illness or 14disability; (ii) employment purposes or the business of the 15public body; (iii) a family or other emergency; or (iv) 16unexpected childcare obligations; or (iv) any other reason 17designated in rules adopted by the public body in accordance 18with subsection (c) below. "Other means" is by video or audio 19conference.20    (b) If a member wishes to attend a meeting by other means, 21the member must notify the recording secretary or clerk of the 22public body before the meeting unless advance notice is 23impractical.  HB2886- 2 -LRB104 08873 BDA 18928 b1    (c) A majority of the public body may allow a member to 2attend a meeting by other means only in accordance with and to 3the extent allowed by rules adopted by the public body. The 4rules must conform to the requirements and restrictions of 5this Section, may further limit the extent to which attendance 6by other means is allowed, and may provide for the giving of 7additional notice to the public or further facilitate public 8access to meetings. 9    (d) The limitations of this Section shall not apply to (i) 10closed meetings of (A) public bodies with statewide 11jurisdiction, (B) Illinois library systems with jurisdiction 12over a specific geographic area of more than 4,500 square 13miles, (C) municipal transit districts with jurisdiction over 14a specific geographic area of more than 4,500 square miles, or 15(D) local workforce innovation areas with jurisdiction over a 16specific geographic area of more than 4,500 square miles or 17(ii) open or closed meetings of State advisory boards or 18bodies that do not have authority to make binding 19recommendations or determinations or to take any other 20substantive action. State advisory boards or bodies, public 21bodies with statewide jurisdiction, Illinois library systems 22with jurisdiction over a specific geographic area of more than 234,500 square miles, municipal transit districts with 24jurisdiction over a specific geographic area of more than 254,500 square miles, and local workforce investment areas with 26jurisdiction over a specific geographic area of more than   HB2886- 3 -LRB104 08873 BDA 18928 b14,500 square miles, however, may permit members to attend 2meetings by other means only in accordance with and to the 3extent allowed by specific procedural rules adopted by the 4body. For the purposes of this Section, "local workforce 5innovation area" means any local workforce innovation area or 6areas designated by the Governor pursuant to the federal 7Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act or its reauthorizing 8legislation. 9    (e) Subject to the requirements of Section 2.06 but 10notwithstanding any other provision of law, an open or closed 11meeting subject to this Act may be conducted by audio or video 12conference, without the physical presence of a quorum of the 13members, so long as the following conditions are met:14        (1) the Governor or the Director of the Illinois 15    Department of Public Health has issued a disaster 16    declaration related to public health concerns because of a 17    disaster as defined in Section 4 of the Illinois Emergency 18    Management Agency Act, and all or part of the jurisdiction 19    of the public body is covered by the disaster area;20        (2) the head of the public body as defined in 21    subsection (e) of Section 2 of the Freedom of Information 22    Act determines that an in-person meeting or a meeting 23    conducted under this Act is not practical or prudent 24    because of a disaster;25        (3) all members of the body participating in the 26    meeting, wherever their physical location, shall be   HB2886- 4 -LRB104 08873 BDA 18928 b1    verified and can hear one another and can hear all 2    discussion and testimony;3        (4) for open meetings, members of the public present 4    at the regular meeting location of the body can hear all 5    discussion and testimony and all votes of the members of 6    the body, unless attendance at the regular meeting 7    location is not feasible due to the disaster, including 8    the issued disaster declaration, in which case the public 9    body must make alternative arrangements and provide notice 10    pursuant to this Section of such alternative arrangements 11    in a manner to allow any interested member of the public 12    access to contemporaneously hear all discussion, 13    testimony, and roll call votes, such as by offering a 14    telephone number or a web-based link;15        (5) at least one member of the body, chief legal 16    counsel, or chief administrative officer is physically 17    present at the regular meeting location, unless unfeasible 18    due to the disaster, including the issued disaster 19    declaration; and20        (6) all votes are conducted by roll call, so each 21    member's vote on each issue can be identified and 22    recorded.23        (7) Except in the event of a bona fide emergency, 48 24    hours' notice shall be given of a meeting to be held 25    pursuant to this Section. Notice shall be given to all 26    members of the public body, shall be posted on the website   HB2886- 5 -LRB104 08873 BDA 18928 b1    of the public body, and shall also be provided to any news 2    media who has requested notice of meetings pursuant to 3    subsection (a) of Section 2.02 of this Act. If the public 4    body declares a bona fide emergency:5            (A) Notice shall be given pursuant to subsection 6        (a) of Section 2.02 of this Act, and the presiding 7        officer shall state the nature of the emergency at the 8        beginning of the meeting.9            (B) The public body must comply with the verbatim 10        recording requirements set forth in Section 2.06 of 11        this Act.12        (8) Each member of the body participating in a meeting 13    by audio or video conference for a meeting held pursuant 14    to this Section is considered present at the meeting for 15    purposes of determining a quorum and participating in all 16    proceedings.17        (9) In addition to the requirements for open meetings 18    under Section 2.06, public bodies holding open meetings 19    under this subsection (e) must also keep a verbatim record 20    of all their meetings in the form of an audio or video 21    recording. Verbatim records made under this paragraph (9) 22    shall be made available to the public under, and are 23    otherwise subject to, the provisions of Section 2.06.24        (10) The public body shall bear all costs associated 25    with compliance with this subsection (e).26(Source: P.A. 103-311, eff. 7-28-23.)